Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-737
Sections, how construed.

Sections 70-701 to 70-738 shall be construed liberally. The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods or things.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 33, p. 213;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-833;

R.S.1943, § 70-737.